Maine, session 132, LD1508.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §1916, sub-§2, ¶A, as amended by PL 2007, c. 186, §2, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (4) to read:
(4) Motor vehicles for which the Chief of the State Police has granted an exception
because the health of the owner or a person who usually occupies the vehicle is
adversely affected by sunlight. The Chief of the State Police may shall, upon
proper application, provide the owner of a motor vehicle with a certificate of
exemption that must be displayed upon the request of a law enforcement officer.
For the purposes of this subparagraph, the following terms have the following
meanings.
(a) "Certified nurse practitioner" means a registered professional nurse
licensed under Title 32, chapter 31 who has received postgraduate education
designed to prepare the nurse for advanced practice registered nursing in a
clinical specialty in nursing that has a defined scope of practice and who has
been certified in the clinical specialty by a national certifying organization
acceptable to the State Board of Nursing.
(b) "Medical provider" means an optometrist, a physician, a physician
assistant or a certified nurse practitioner.
(c) "Optometrist" has the same meaning as in Title 32, section 19101,
subsection 20.
(d) "Physician" means an individual licensed as an osteopathic physician by
the Board of Osteopathic Licensure pursuant to Title 32, chapter 36 or an
individual licensed as a physician or surgeon by the Board of Licensure in
Medicine pursuant to Title 32, chapter 48.
(e) "Physician assistant" means an individual licensed as a physician assistant
by the Board of Osteopathic Licensure pursuant to Title 32, chapter 36 or an
individual licensed as a physician assistant by the Board of Licensure in
Medicine pursuant to Title 32, chapter 48.
(f) "Proper application" means an application that includes a written request
signed by a medical provider.